Utah statutes.
73-3c-201.   Reuse by a public agency owning underlying water right.

(1)  A public agency owning or operating a POTW that treats domestic wastewater consisting of water supplied under a water right the public agency owns may use, or contract for the use of, reuse water if:

(a)   the water right is administered by the state engineer as a municipal water right;

(b)  the reuse is consistent, under Subsection 73-3c-302(5), with the underlying water right; and

(c)  the public agency receives approval in accordance with Sections 73-3c-301 and 73-3c-302.

(2)  A change application shall be filed in accordance with Section 73-3-3 if the public agency proposes a water reuse that is inconsistent with the underlying water right.

